Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2106
Director; reports.

The Director of Agriculture shall make reports to the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, in such form, and containing such information, as the secretary may from time to time reasonably require. The Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, upon request, shall be given access to the records upon which such information is based.

Laws 1951, c. 4, § 6, p. 66.